src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON GAHPIRLONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ; ! gahpirgánda, čoahkkinordnet
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;
 :%> MALLAS- ;		! GAI, NPx, NPl
   DenominalNounsC ;
   DenominalAdjsCLong ;
 +Use/-PLX: GEAHTES ;
 +Err/DerSub: KEAHTTA-PRED ;




!!   Trisyllabic nouns
!!!!!   2. SPECIAL SECTION:
!!!!!   2a. special lexicas for stray words/isolated occurrences
!!!!!   2b. tweaked lexicas (mostly) for speller reasons
!!!!!   2c. plural nouns
!!!!!   2d. Action nouns
!!!!!   2e. diminutives
! - - - - - - - - --------------------------------------




!!!!!   2a. special lexicas for stray words/isolated occurrences
!        --------------------------------------------------------


LEXICON EANA !!≈ * **@CODE@** eana, eanan, eatnan
+v2+Dial/-GG:eatnam8 SEAMU ;
+v1+Dial/-KJ:eatnam MALIS ;
+v3:eatnam GAHPIR ;


LEXICON DOAVTTIR !!≈ * **@CODE@** only doavttir. Short compound-forms
 :%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX+Use/NG:%>X4 R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X8 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X4 DenominalAdjsCShort ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X8 GEAHTES ;
!+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:až»X2 DIMINC ; !redundant
!+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:až»X2 DIMINC ; !redundant


LEXICON OVCCIS_N !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Collective numerals gallis, moattes, moattis, máŋggas
 +N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum:%>X2 MALLAS- ;


LEXICON DAIVVAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** Tris. Gradating C-Nouns, The Troms declension: dáivvaš:dáivaha, bearaš:bearraha, njunuš:njunnoha
 +Sg+Nom:š%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:š%>X4in K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:š%>X4 R ;
 +Sg+Nom:h%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:h%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:h%>X2 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:h%>X2a R ; !compound also for these
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:h%>X2 R ; ! !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen:h%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:h%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:h%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:h%>X2 NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:h%>X2at K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:h%>X2ak K ;
 +Sg+Ill:h%>X2asa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Nom:h%>X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 :h%>X2i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
 :š%>X4 DenominalAdjsCLong ;
 :h%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
 +Use/-PLX:š%>X4 GEAHTES ;



!!!!!   2b. tweaked lexicas (mostly) for speller reasons
!        ------------------------------------------------


LEXICON BOADA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns  TO AVOID BOAĐAN
! :%>X4 BOAZU-NE ; !NE  replaced by individual pointers
 +Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:%>X4»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:%>X4»X7viđi K ;
 !+Ess:%>X4n K ; here is boađan
 +Ess:%>X4n%> NPxC ;
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;


LEXICON DAHPPAGA !!≈ * **@CODE@**  the dáhpahuvvá fix nr2. to avoid dahpahuvvat in speller
 :%>X4 BOAZU-NE ; !NE
 :%>X2 MALLAS- ;
 :%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
!   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;


LEXICON ENGEL !!≈ * **@CODE@** Restricted denominals for speller   -eŋgel
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;    ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;
 :%> MALLAS- ;		 ! GAI, NPx, NPl
 +Use/-Spell: DenominalNounsC ;
 +Use/-Spell: DenominalAdjsCShort ;
 +Use/-PLX:%>X7 GEAHTES ;



!!!!!   2c. Plural nouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON MAGASH !!≈ * **@CODE@** reciprocals like verddežat, jumežat etc
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;




LEXICON BADJOSAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Pl. bajus:badjosat, short cmp-form
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X4 flagOFF-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X8 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
! +Sg+Gen: K ; !SUB
! +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Nom:%>X2at K ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%> NPx1V ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>X4t K ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPx1C ;
! +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jde K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»X4W4#heapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Ess+Err/Orth:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n K ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»X4W4#his ATTR ;
! +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»X4W4#his VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON ATTR
 +Use/-PLX:%>X8 GEAHTES ;
