src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns  !!= * **@CODE@** is pointed to from NounRoot above
Johkamohkki-márkanat+N+CmpNP/First+Sem/Event:Johkamohkki-márkan BADJOSAT ;
Rundberg-vieljažat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:Rundberg9-vieljaž MAGASH ;
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
beležat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:belež MAGASH ;
egežat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:egež MAGASH ;
guimmežat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guimmež MAGASH ;
lávežat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lávež MAGASH ;
oarpmebeležat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oarpme#belež MAGASH ;
ránnežat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ránnež MAGASH ;
vielljabeležat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:viellja#belež MAGASH ;
ássanguimmežat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ássan#guimmež MAGASH ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
bartavahát+N+Sem/Dummytag:barta#vahág GAHPIRLONG ;
bassimállásat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:bassi#mállis BADJOSAT ;
beassážat+N+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Time:beassaž MAGASH ;
boazoeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:boazo# EANA ;
boađa+N+Sem/Dummytag:boahºtag8 BOADA ;
buohkaidčoahkkin+N+Sem/Event:buohkaid9#čoahkkim GAHPIRLONG ;
buđaš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Fruit:buhºta DAIVVAS ;
bádjasat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpNP/Last+Sem/Dummytag:bádºjas BADJOSAT ;
bádjedoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:bádje#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
dahpa+N+Sem/Dummytag:dahppag8 DAHPPAGA ;
dovddan+N+Sem/Obj-el:dovddan GAHPIRLONG ;
duiskkaeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:duiskka# EANA ;
dábálašdoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:dábálaš#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
dáivvaš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Dummytag:dájºva DAIVVAS ;
dállodoallobiergasat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:dállo#doallo#bierºgas BADJOSAT ;
dárbbaš+v2+N+Sem/Perc-phys:dárºba DAIVVAS ; !OK
eatnanvuovdinstivrračoahkkin+N+Sem/Event:eatnan#vuovdin#stivrra#čoahkkim GAHPIRLONG ;
eŋgel+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eŋgel ENGEL ;
eŋgel+N+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:engel ENGEL ;
fylkkadoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:fylkka#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
fástadoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:fásta#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
gallis+CmpNP/None:galºlis OVCCIS_N ;
galmmihanmekanihkkár+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:galmmihan#mekanihkkár GAHPIRLONG ;
ganeš+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gatne DAIVVAS ; !OK
gaskavuoigŋašat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:gaska#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
gearpmaš+v1+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gearbma DAIVVAS ; !OK
geasseeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:geasse# EANA ;
goikeeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:goike# EANA ;
gudneboargár+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gudne#boargár GAHPIRLONG ;
gudnedoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:gudne#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
guovllušibitdoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:guovllu#šibit#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
gáneš+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gátne DAIVVAS ; !OK
heastabiergasat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:heasta#bierºgas BADJOSAT ;
hoavdadoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:hoavda#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
huksenbargoeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:huksen#bargo# EANA ;
huksensnihkkár+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:huksen#snihkkár GAHPIRLONG ;
imaš+v1+N+CmpNP/Last+Sem/Act:ipma DAIVVAS ; !OK
kalohttaođđasat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:kalohtta#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
konsultašunčoahkkin+N+Sem/Event:konsultašun#čoahkkim GAHPIRLONG ;
kultureana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Plc:kultur# EANA ;
luleš+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:lulle DAIVVAS ; 
moattis+v2+CmpNP/None:moadde7s OVCCIS_N ; !OK
moattis+v1+CmpNP/None:moaddis OVCCIS_N ;  !OK
muohtaeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:muohta# EANA ;
muohtaeŋgel+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Obj:muohta#eŋgel ENGEL ;
mállásat+N+Sem/Event:mállis BADJOSAT ;
mánáiddoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:mánáid9#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
mátkedávvir+N+Sem/Obj:mátke#dávvir GAHPIRLONG ;
máŋggas+CmpNP/None:máŋºgas OVCCIS_N ;
njunuš+v1+N+Sem/Hum_Plc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:njunnu DAIVVAS ;    !OK
oappážat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oappáž MAGASH ;
proavás+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:proavást GAHPIRLONG ;
páhpagárdineana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:páhpa#gárdin# EANA ;
rumaš+v1+N+Sem/Body:rupma DAIVVAS ; !OK
ráđđasat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:ráđđas BADJOSAT ;
skealbmadoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:skealbma#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
snuolggár+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:snuolggár GAHPIRLONG ;
soldeeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:solde# EANA ;
sorbmeneŋgel+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sorbmen#eŋgel ENGEL ;
sykehuonaš+N+Sem/Build+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:syke^huotna DAIVVAS ;
sáhppasat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:sáhppas BADJOSAT ;
viidnegárdeeaiggát+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:viidne#gárde#eaiggád GAHPIRLONG ;
vuolleeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:vuolle# EANA ;
váibmodoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:váibmo#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
váldoeŋgel+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:váldo#eŋgel ENGEL ;
árbmomállásat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:árbmo#mállis BADJOSAT ;
čuohpahandoavttir+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:čuohpahan#doakºtir DOAVTTIR ;
čáhceeana+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:čáhce# EANA ;
